Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 9

Boards of Trustees for State Facilities

33-2-901. Creation of boards — Members — Appointment — Expenses — Meetings — Term of office.

In order to coordinate the activities of the department's facilities, to advise the chief officer at each facility, and to better acquaint the public with the needs and activities of the facility, there shall be boards of trustees for each facility to be composed of fifteen (15) members each.

The commissioner, the appropriate assistant commissioner, and the chief officer at each facility shall be ex officio members of each board of trustees.

The fifteen (15) members shall be appointed by the commissioner, and all shall reside in the area served by the facility.

State officials are eligible for appointment by the commissioner, but not more than three (3) state officials shall be appointed members of the board at the same time.

The chair and the vice chair of each board shall be designated by the commissioner.

The members of each board shall receive no compensation but shall receive their actual traveling expenses for attendance upon meetings of the boards. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in conformity with the comprehensive travel rules.

The chief officer of each facility shall serve as secretary for the respective boards.

The board shall meet at least annually at a place to be designated by the chair and may meet more often upon call of the chair, or a majority of the members.

The term of board members shall be three (3) years. Terms shall be staggered so that five (5) terms expire each year. The terms of members begin on July 1 next following the appointments. Subsequent appointments shall be made for a period of three (3) years, except that vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the commissioner for the unexpired term only. A member may serve no more than two (2) consecutive full terms.

Members may be removed upon their failure to attend at least one half (½) of the scheduled meetings in any one-year period, or for good cause.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 33-201, 33-2-201; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-2-902. Duties of boards.

It is the duty of each board of trustees to advise the chief officer of each facility concerning the formulation of general policies to be followed in the operation of the facility under the chief officer's jurisdiction, to recommend to the department appropriate legislation for resources and other concerns for the facility, and to publicize generally the condition of the facility and its needs.

Each board of trustees in conjunction with its chief officer shall report annually to the commissioner.

Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-201; Acts 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-2-202; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.